Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.900

Conflict with federal requirements.

If any part of this chapter is found to be in conflict with federal requirements which are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this chapter is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and such finding or determination shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this chapter in its application to the agencies concerned. The rules under this chapter shall meet federal requirements which are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state.

[ 1983 c 161 s 21.]